Washington statutes.
RCW 27.24.067

Free use of library.

The use of the county law library shall be free to the judges of the state, to state and county officials, and to members of the bar, and to such others as the board of trustees may by rule provide. Residents of counties with a population of three hundred thousand or more shall have free use of the law library.

[ 1992 c 62 s 6; 1933 c 167 s 3, part; RRS s 8254-8.]